Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0448.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10q. (1) The state transportation department shall establish and administer a road investment incentive program that makes matching grants to local road agencies in this state. (2) The road investment incentive program described in subsection (1) must provide for all of the following: (a) Grants to local road agencies must be made on a dollar-for-dollar matching basis if the local road agency uses the grant for construction, maintenance, or repair of highways, roads, streets, and bridges under the jurisdiction of that local road agency. (b) Funds used by the local road agency to match the grant must not be from a federal or state source. (c) The total amount of grants awarded to local road agencies under the grant program must not exceed an amount equal to 1 mill on each dollar of the taxable value of all taxable property within the jurisdiction of this state. (d) The department shall create application, decision, award, and distribution criteria and post the criteria on the department's website. (3) A local road agency that receives a matching grant under this section shall, each year, verify the amount and source of local road funds dedicated for construction, maintenance, or repair of highways, roads, streets, or bridges used for the matching grant under this section.